District of Columbia statutes.
31-756

Applicability; membership interest; powers.

(a)

A membership interest in a mutual insurance holding company shall not constitute an equity security as defined in § 31-603.

(b)

A mutual insurance holding company created under this subchapter shall have the same powers to borrow or assume liability as a reciprocal insurance company organized under District law.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-112, § 7, 45 DCR 1792
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-751.
1981 Ed., § 35-3746.